Maine, session 132, LD1328.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §20059 is enacted to read:
§20059. Recovery residences for LGBTQIA+ individuals; fund established
1. Recovery residences for LGBTQIA+ individuals. The Maine State Housing
Authority shall contract for the operation of at least 3 recovery residences certified in
accordance with section 20057 that are led and governed by individuals in recovery from
substance use disorder and that identify as LGBTQIA+ and provide services to LGBTQIA+
individuals recovering from substance use disorder and other individuals recovering from
substance use disorder, regardless of sexual orientation or gender identity, that meets the
criteria established by the Maine State Housing Authority. For purposes of this section,
"LGBTQIA+" includes, but is not limited to, lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, queer,
questioning, intersex and asexual.
2. Location. Of the certified recovery residences contracted pursuant to subsection 1,
one must be in a locality with a population of 60,000 or greater; one must be in a locality
with a population between 20,000 and 59,999; and one must be in a locality with a
population of less than 20,000.
3. Services. A certified recovery residence contracted under this section must provide
the following:
A. A central shared living and meeting space;
B. Recovery support services based on the needs of each resident; and
C. Support services specifically designed to address the unique needs of LGBTQIA+
individuals.
4. Staffing. Each certified recovery residence contracted under this section must be
staffed by at least 2 peer-to-peer support staff members who are certified in intentional peer
support and peer recovery coaching and who are paid at least livable wages, as defined in
Title 26, section 1-A.
5. Fund established. The LGBTQIA+ Recovery Residence Fund is established as a
nonlapsing fund within the Maine State Housing Authority to receive funds to support the
activities described in this section and may accept private donations. The Maine State
Housing Authority shall distribute funds through a competitive bid process to grantees. The
Maine State Housing Authority shall adopt rules establishing criteria for the competitive
bid process and for the distribution of funds to grantees under this subsection.